New Jersey, session 222, S4326.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    An insurer or insurance producer shall not: a.     Deny, cancel, refuse to renew, or raise the premium of a homeowners insurance policy, or provide a higher premium than the insurer or insurance provider would otherwise provide, in whole or in part on the basis of an insureds or applicants credit history; b.    Use an insureds or applicants credit history as a factor, in whole or in part, when assessing an insureds or an applicants risk level regarding: (1)   the provision or removal of a discount; (2)   assigning the insured or applicant to a rating tier; or (3)   placing an insured or applicant with an insurance agent; or c.     Use an insureds or applicants credit history to evaluate in whole or in part, an insureds or applicants eligibility for certain payment plans. 2. This act shall take effect 90 days after the date of enactment.